Colorado, session 2026A, HB1116.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-65-106, amend
(8)(d)(I) as follows:
27-65-106. Emergency mental health hold - screening -
court-ordered evaluation - discharge instructions - respondent's rights.
(8) (d) (I) The facility shall, at a minimum, attempt to follow up with
the person, the person's parent or legal guardian, or the person's lay person
at least forty-eight WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO hours after discharge, EXCLUDING
WEEKENDS AND HOLIDAYS. The facility is encouraged to utilize peer support
professionals, as defined in section 27-60-108 (2)(b), when performing
follow-up care with individuals and in developing a continuing care plan
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

pursuant to subsection (8)(a)(I) of this section. The facility may facilitate
follow-up care through contracts with community-based behavioral health
providers or the 988 crisis hotline operated pursuant to section 27-64-103.
If the facility facilitates follow-up care through a third-party contract, the
facility shall obtain authorization from the person to provide follow-up care.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 27-50-501, amend (3)
as follows:
27-50-501. Behavioral health entities - license required -
criminal and civil penalties.
(3) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
BHA shall not ONLY issue or renew any A license described in this part 5
unless IF the BHA receives a certificate of compliance for the applicant's
building or structure from the division of fire prevention and control in the
department of public safety in accordance with part 12 of article 33.5 of title
24; EXCEPT THAT:
(I) AN APPLICANT THAT PROVIDES ONLY TELEHEALTH SERVICES IS
NOT REQUIRED TO RECEIVE A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE; AND
(II) AN APPLICANT THAT PROVIDES ONLY OUTPATIENT SERVICES MAY
RECEIVE A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE FROM THE DIVISION OF FIRE
PREVENTION AND CONTROL BASED ON INSPECTIONS CONDUCTED BY A FIRE
DEPARTMENT, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-33.5-1202, THAT EMPLOYS AN
INSPECTOR CERTIFIED PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-33.5-1211 RATHER THAN
FROM THE DIVISION OF FIRE PREVENTION AND CONTROL.
(b) The BHA shall take action on an application for licensure within
thirty days after the date that the BHA receives from the applicant all of the
necessary information and documentation required for licensure. including
a certificate of compliance from the division of fire prevention and control.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1116

such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1116